Utah statutes.
53A-2-205.   Permitting attendance by nonresident of the state -- Tuition.

(1)  A local school board may permit a child residing outside the state to attend school within the district.  With the exception of a child enrolled under Section 53A-2-206, the child is not included for the purpose of apportionment of state funds.

(2)  The board shall charge the nonresident child tuition at least equal to the per capita cost of the school program in which the child enrolls unless the board, in open meeting, determines to waive the charge for that child in whole or in part.  The official minutes of the meeting shall reflect the determination.



Enacted by Chapter 2, 1988 General Session

